Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4408
Examination of financial condition; required.

Any risk retention group shall submit to an examination by the director to determine its financial condition if the commissioner of the state in which the group is chartered and licensed has not initiated an examination or does not initiate an examination within sixty days after a request by the director. Any such examination shall be coordinated to avoid unjustified repetition and conducted in an expeditious manner and in accordance with the National Association of Insurance Commissioner's Examiner Handbook.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 50.